Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Occupational or professional service” means a service:
(A) That an individual must possess a license,  certificate or other form of authorization
to provide under the laws of this state; and
(B) Over which a professional licensing board has regulatory oversight.
(b) “Professional licensing board” means a state agency or board that licenses, certifies
or otherwise authorizes individuals to provide an occupational or professional service.
(2) A professional licensing board shall:
(a) Ensure that any staff of the  professional licensing board who interact with interna-
tionally educated individuals  through the licensure, certification or other authorization
process receive culturally responsive training approved by  the Office of Immigrant and Ref-
ugee Advancement.
(b) Develop and publish on a website operated by or on behalf of the professional licensing
board clear and easily understandable guidance regarding pathways to licensure, certification
or other authorization issued by the professional licensing board for internationally  educated
individuals. The guidance developed under this paragraph  must include information on eligi-
bility requirements,  processes, costs and timelines for licensure, certification or other au-
thorization.
(3) A professional licensing board may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 2.
A professional licensing board shall publish the guidance described in section
1 of this 2025 Act not later than July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. (1) Section 1 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) A professional licensing board may take any action before the operative  date specified
in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the professional licensing board
to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all  of
the duties, functions and powers  conferred on the professional licensing board by section 1
of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4.
Sections 5 and 6 of this 2025 Act are added  to and made a part of ORS
chapter 677.
Enrolled Senate Bill 476 (SB 476-C) Page 1
SECTION 5. Not later than February 1 of  each odd-numbered year, the Oregon Medical
Board shall report, in the manner provided in ORS  192.245, to the interim committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to health care, on the provisional  licensure of internationally
trained physicians under section 6 of this 2025 Act. The report must include the following
information from the two immediately preceding calendar years:
(1) The number of applications for provisional licensure received;
(2) The numbers of provisional licenses issued or denied;
(3) An aggregated  list of employers that employed provisionally licensed internationally
trained physicians; and
(4) Any disciplinary or  remedial actions taken against provisionally licensed interna-
tionally trained physicians.
SECTION 6.
(1) The Oregon Medical Board may  issue a provisional license to a qualified
internationally trained physician. To be considered for a provisional license under this sec-
tion, an internationally trained physician must have:
(a) Graduated from a school of medicine with a degree substantially similar to a degree
of Doctor of Medicine or Doctor of Osteopathic Medicine, as determined by the board;
(b) Completed a training program that is substantially similar to an  approved training
program, as determined by the board;
(c) Obtained certification from the Educational  Council for Foreign Medical Graduates,
or its successor organization, as approved by the board;
(d) Practiced medicine in another country or jurisdiction for at least three years;
(e) An offer of employment at a clinical  facility located in this state that will provide
supervision and assessment of the applicant in  accordance with standards established by the
board by rule;
(f) Complied with all board rules that apply  to similar applicants for a license to practice
medicine in this state; and
(g) Provided evidence, as determined sufficient by the board, that the  applicant is of good
moral character consistent with the requirements of  ORS 677.100 and in good standing in
each country or jurisdiction in which the applicant practiced and received education and
training.
(2) An applicant for a provisional license under this section shall:
(a) Apply to the board in the form and manner required by the board;
(b) Pay the fee established by the board by rule; and
(c) Provide to the board any further information required by the board.
(3) An internationally trained physician provisionally licensed under this section  shall
practice:
(a) Under the supervision of a physician  licensed under ORS 677.100 who is in good
standing with the board and meets the requirements established by the board relating to
supervision; and
(b)(A) In a facility in this state with an approved training program;
(B) In a federally qualified  health center that provides primary care and other services
to underserved populations, as determined by the board; or
(C) In any  other clinical location that demonstrates that the location meets the re-
quirements established by the board by rule.
(4) An internationally trained physician provisionally licensed under this section:
(a) Is  considered a fully licensed physician in this state for all purposes, including but
not limited to credentialing and insurance billing;
(b) Is subject to all the provisions of this chapter  and to rules of the board adopted under
this chapter; and
(c) Has the same duties and responsibilities, and is subject to the same  penalties and
sanctions, as any other physician licensed under this chapter.
Enrolled Senate Bill 476 (SB 476-C) Page 2
(5) An internationally trained  physician provisionally licensed under this section may,
after completion of four years of full-time equivalent practice under subsection (3) of this
section, successful completion of  a clinical assessment evaluation as determined by the board
by rule and satisfaction of  the requirements for licensure under ORS 677.100, apply for
licensure under ORS 677.100.
(6) The board may adopt rules as necessary to carry out this section.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 677.010 is amended to read:
677.010. As used in this chapter, subject to the exemptions in ORS 677.060 and  unless the con-
text requires otherwise:
(1) “Approved internship” means the first year of post-graduate training [ served in a hospital that
is approved by the  board or ] that is accredited  by the Accreditation Council of Graduate Medical
Education, the American Osteopathic Association or the Royal  College of Physicians and Surgeons
of Canada , and approved by the Oregon Medical Board .
(2) “Approved school of medicine” means a school  offering a full-time resident program of study
in medicine or osteopathic medicine leading to a degree of  Doctor of Medicine or Doctor of
Osteopathic Medicine, [ such program having been ] if the program of study  is  fully accredited or
conditionally approved by the Liaison Committee on Medical Education,  or its successor agency, or
the American Osteopathic Association,  or its successor agency, or the Committee on Accredi-
tation of Canadian Medical Schools, or its successor agency,  or [ having been  otherwise ] has
otherwise been determined by the board to meet the  association standards as specifically incorpo-
rated into board rules.
[(3) “Board” means the Oregon Medical Board. ]
(3) “Approved training  program” means a residency program that is accredited by the
Accreditation Council  of Graduate Medical Education, or its successor organization, the
American Osteopathic  Association, or its successor organization, or the Royal College of
Physicians and Surgeons of Canada, or its successor organization, and approved by the
board.
(4) “Diagnose”  means to examine another person in any manner to determine the source or na-
ture of a disease or other physical or mental condition, or to hold  oneself out or represent that a
person is so examining another person. It is  not necessary that the examination be made in the
presence of such other person; it may be made on information supplied either  directly or indirectly
by such other person.
(5) “Dispense” means the preparation and delivery of a prescription drug,  pursuant to a lawful
order of a practitioner, in a suitable container appropriately labeled for subsequent  administration
to or use by a patient or other individual entitled to receive the prescription drug.
(6) “Dispensing  physician” means a physician or podiatric physician and surgeon who purchases
prescription drugs for the purpose of dispensing them to patients or other individuals entitled to
receive the prescription drug and who dispenses them accordingly.
(7) “Drug” means all medicines and preparations for internal or external use of humans, in-
tended to be used for the  cure, mitigation or prevention of diseases or abnormalities of humans,
which are recognized in any published United States Pharmacopoeia or National  Formulary, or
otherwise established as a drug.
(8) “Fellow” means an individual who has not qualified under ORS 677.100  (1) and (2) and who
is pursuing some special line of study as part of a supervised program of a school  of medicine, a
hospital approved for internship  or residency training, or an institution for medical research or ed-
ucation that provides for a  period of study under the supervision of a responsible member of that
hospital or institution, such school, hospital or institution having been approved by the board.
(9) “Intern” means an individual who has entered  into a hospital or hospitals for the first year
of post-graduate training.
(10) “Internationally trained physician” means a physician who graduated from a medical
school that is  not an approved school of medicine and who completed a training program that
is not an approved training program.
Enrolled Senate Bill 476 (SB 476-C) Page 3
[(10)] (11) “License” means permission  to practice, whether by license, registration or certif-
ication.
[(11)] (12) “Licensee” means an individual holding a valid license issued by the board.
[(12)] (13) “Physical incapacity” means a condition that renders an individual licensed under this
chapter unable to practice under that  license with professional skill and safety by reason of physical
illness or physical deterioration that adversely affects cognition, motor or perceptive skill.
[(13)] (14) “Physician” means a person who holds a degree of Doctor of Medicine or Doctor  of
Osteopathic Medicine, or a  person who holds a degree of Doctor of Podiatric Medicine if the context
in which the term “physician” is used  does not authorize or require the person to practice outside
the scope of a license issued under ORS 677.805 to 677.840.
[(14)] (15) “Podiatric physician and surgeon” means a physician licensed under ORS 677.805 to
677.840 to practice podiatry.
[(15)(a)] (16)(a) “Podiatry” means:
(A) The diagnosis or the medical, physical or surgical treatment of  ailments of the human foot,
ankle and tendons  directly attached to and governing the function of the foot and ankle, and treat-
ment involving the use of a general or  spinal anesthetic if that treatment is performed in a hospital
licensed under ORS 441.025 or in an ambulatory surgical  center licensed by the Oregon Health
Authority and is  under the supervision of or in collaboration with a podiatric physician and surgeon;
(B) Assisting in the performance of surgery, as provided in ORS 677.814; and
(C) The treatment of skin, skin-related structures and subcutaneous masses, and wounds in-
volving skin, skin-related structures and subcutaneous  masses, on the human leg no further proximal
than the tibial tubercle.
(b) “Podiatry” does not include administering general or spinal  anesthetics or the amputation
of the entire foot.
[(16)] (17) “Prescribe” means to direct, order or designate the use  of or manner of using by
spoken or written words or other means.
[(17)] (18) “Resident” means an individual who, after the first year of post-graduate  training, in
order to qualify for some particular specialty in the field of medicine, pursues  a special line of study
as part of a supervised program of a hospital approved by the board.
SECTION 7a.
If Senate Bill 874 becomes law, section 7 of this 2025 Act  (amending ORS
677.010) is repealed and ORS 677.010, as amended by section 1, chapter 344, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled Senate Bill 874), is amended to read:
677.010. As used in  this chapter, subject to the exemptions in ORS 677.060 and unless the con-
text requires otherwise:
(1) “Approved internship” means the first year of post-graduate training [ served in a hospital that
is approved by the Oregon Medical Board or ] that is accredited  by  the Accreditation Council for
Graduate Medical Education  or its successor organization, the American Osteopathic Association
or its successor  organization or the Royal College of Physicians and Surgeons of Canada or its
successor organization , and approved by the Oregon Medical Board .
(2) “Approved school of medicine” means a school  offering a full-time resident program of study
in medicine or osteopathic medicine leading to a degree of  Doctor of Medicine or Doctor of
Osteopathic Medicine, [ such program having been ] if the program of study  is  fully accredited or
conditionally approved by the Liaison Committee on Medical Education,  or its successor agency, or
the American Osteopathic Association,  or its successor agency,  or the Committee on Accredi-
tation of Canadian Medical Schools, or its successor agency,  or [ having been  otherwise ] has
otherwise been determined by the board to meet the  association standards as specifically incorpo-
rated into board rules.
(3) “Approved training  program” means a residency program that is accredited by the
Accreditation Council  of Graduate Medical Education, or its successor organization, the
American Osteopathic  Association, or its successor organization, or the Royal College of
Physicians and Surgeons of Canada, or its successor organization, and approved by the
board.
Enrolled Senate Bill 476 (SB 476-C) Page 4
[(3)] (4)  “Diagnose” means to examine another person in any manner to determine the source
or nature of a disease or other physical or mental condition, or  to hold oneself out or represent that
a person is so examining another person. It is not  necessary that the examination be made in the
presence of such other person; the examination may be made on information supplied either directly
or indirectly by such other person.
[(4)] (5)  “Dispense” means the preparation and delivery of a prescription drug,  pursuant to a
lawful order of a practitioner, in a suitable container appropriately labeled  for subsequent adminis-
tration to or use by a patient or other individual entitled to receive the prescription drug.
[(5)] (6)  “Dispensing physician”  means a physician or podiatric physician and surgeon who pur-
chases prescription drugs for the  purpose of dispensing them to patients or other individuals entitled
to receive the prescription drug and who dispenses them accordingly.
[(6)] (7)  “Drug” means all medicines and preparations for internal or  external use of humans,
intended to be used for the cure, mitigation  or prevention of diseases or abnormalities of humans,
which are recognized in any published United States Pharmacopoeia or National  Formulary, or
otherwise established as a drug.
[(7)] (8)  “Fellow” means an individual who has not qualified under  ORS 677.100 (1) and (2) and
who is pursuing some special line of study as part of a supervised program of a  school of medicine,
a hospital  approved for internship or residency training, or an institution for medical research or
education that provides for a period of study under the supervision of  a responsible member of that
hospital or institution, such school, hospital or institution having been approved by the board.
[(8)] (9)  “Intern” means an individual who has entered into a hospital  or hospitals for the first
year of post-graduate training.
(10) “Internationally trained physician” means a physician who graduated from a medical
school that is  not an approved school of medicine and who completed a training program that
is not an approved training program.
[(9)] (11)  “License” means permission to practice, whether by license, registration or certif-
ication.
[(10)] (12) “Licensee” means an individual holding a valid license issued by the board.
[(11)] (13) “Physical incapacity” means a condition that renders an individual licensed under this
chapter unable to practice under that  license with professional skill and safety by reason of physical
illness or physical deterioration that adversely affects cognition, motor or perceptive skill.
[(12)] (14) “Physician” means a person who holds a degree of Doctor of Medicine or Doctor  of
Osteopathic Medicine, or a  person who holds a degree of Doctor of Podiatric Medicine if the context
in which the term “physician” is used  does not authorize or require the person to practice outside
the scope of a license issued under ORS 677.805 to 677.840.
[(13)] (15) “Podiatric physician and surgeon” means a physician licensed under ORS 677.805 to
677.840 to practice podiatry.
[(14)(a)] (16)(a) “Podiatry” means:
(A) The diagnosis or the medical, physical or surgical treatment of  ailments of the human foot,
ankle and tendons  directly attached to and governing the function of the foot and ankle, and treat-
ment involving the use of a general or  spinal anesthetic if that treatment is performed in a hospital
licensed under ORS 441.025 or in an ambulatory surgical  center licensed by the Oregon Health
Authority and is  under the supervision of or in collaboration with a podiatric physician and surgeon;
(B) Assisting in the performance of surgery, as provided in ORS 677.814; and
(C) The treatment of skin, skin-related structures and subcutaneous masses, and wounds in-
volving skin, skin-related structures and subcutaneous  masses, on the human leg no further proximal
than the tibial tubercle.
(b) “Podiatry” does not include administering general or spinal  anesthetics or the amputation
of the entire foot.
[(15)] (17)  “Prescribe” means to direct, order or designate the use  of or manner of using by
spoken or written words or other means.
Enrolled Senate Bill 476 (SB 476-C) Page 5
[(16)] (18) “Resident” means an individual who, after the first year of post-graduate  training, in
order to qualify for some particular specialty in the field of medicine, pursues  a special line of study
as part of a supervised program of a hospital approved by the board.
[(17)] (19)  “Traditional Eastern medicine” means  the practice of medicine, specifically
acupuncture and traditional Chinese medicine, regulated by this chapter if the medicine is  practiced
within the context of a person’s  license to practice acupuncture issued under ORS 677.757 to
677.770.
SECTION 8.  ORS 677.100 is amended to read:
677.100. (1) An applicant for a license to practice medicine in  this state, except as otherwise
provided in subsection (2) of this section, must possess the following qualifications:
(a) Have attended and graduated from a school of medicine.
(b) Have satisfactorily completed the following post-graduate requirement:
(A) Satisfactory completion of an approved rotating internship if  a graduate of an approved
school of medicine;
(B) One year of training  in an approved program if a graduate of an approved school of medi-
cine; [ or]
(C) Three years of training in an approved program if a graduate of an unapproved school  of
medicine ; or
(D) Four years of provisional licensure under section 6 of this 2025 Act .
(c) Have complied with each rule of  the Oregon Medical Board which applies to all similar ap-
plicants for a license to practice medicine in this state.
(d) Have provided evidence sufficient to prove to the satisfaction of the  board that the applicant
is of good moral character. For purposes of this section, the lack of good  moral character may be
established by reference to  acts or conduct that reflect moral turpitude or to acts or conduct which
would cause a reasonable person to have substantial doubts about the  individual’s honesty, fairness
and respect for the rights of others and  for the laws of the state and the nation. The acts or conduct
in question must be rationally connected to the applicant’s fitness to practice medicine.
(2) If an applicant establishes that the applicant is of  good moral character and has qualifica-
tions which the board determines are the  equivalent of the qualifications required by subsection
(1)(a) to (c) of this section, the applicant satisfies the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.
(3) An applicant for a license to  practice medicine [ must make written application ] shall apply
to the board in a manner  showing compliance with this section, ORS 677.110, 677.120 and the rules
of the board, and containing [ such] any further information as the rules of the board may require.
SECTION 9.
(1) Section 5 of  this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 677.010 by section
7 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) Section 6 of this 2025 Act and  the amendments to ORS 677.100 by section 8 of this 2025
Act become operative on January 1, 2027.
(3) The Oregon Medical Board  may take any action before the operative dates specified
in subsections (1) and (2) of this section that is necessary for the  board to exercise, on and
after the operative dates specified in subsections (1) and (2) of this  section, all of the duties,
functions and powers conferred  on the board by sections 5 and 6 of this 2025 Act and the
amendments to ORS 677.010 and 677.100 by sections 7 and 8 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 9a.  If Senate Bill 874 becomes law, section 9 of this 2025 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 9. (1) Section 5 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 677.010 by section [ 7] 7a of
this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) Section 6 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 677.100  by section 8 of this 2025 Act
become operative on January 1, 2027.
(3) The Oregon Medical Board may take any action before the operative dates specified in  sub-
sections (1) and (2) of this section that is necessary for the board to  exercise, on and after the op-
erative dates specified in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, all of the  duties, functions and
powers conferred on the board by  sections 5 and 6 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS
677.010 and 677.100 by sections [ 7] 7a and 8 of this 2025 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 476 (SB 476-C) Page 6
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1,  chapter 364, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5022),
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses  from
fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Medical Board, is increased  by
$59,747 for the purpose of licensing internationally trained physicians under section 6  of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 11. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
Repassed by Senate June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 476 (SB 476-C) Page 7